Utah statutes.
31A-27a-507.   Receiver as lien creditor.

(1)  The receiver may avoid a transfer of or lien on the property of, or obligation incurred by, an insurer that the insurer or a policyholder, creditor, member, or stockholder of the insurer:

(a)  may have avoided without regard to any knowledge of:

(i)  the receiver;

(ii)  the commissioner;

(iii)  the insurer; or

(iv)  a policyholder, creditor, member, or stockholder of the insurer; and

(b)  whether or not a policyholder, creditor, member, or stockholder described in this Subsection (1) exists.

(2)  The receiver is considered a creditor without knowledge for purposes of pursuing claims under:

(a)  Title 25, Chapter 6, Uniform Fraudulent Transfer Act; or

(b)  similar provisions of state or federal law.

